Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB982.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 24 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a part to read:PART I-ABASIC EDUCATIO N Chapter21. Preliminary Provisions23. Safety in SchoolsCHAPTER 21PRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSec.2101. Scope of part.2102. Definitions.§ 2101. Scope of part.This part relates to educational matters impacting 12345678910111213141516171819 kindergarten through grade 12 in this Commonwealth.§ 2102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this part which are applicable to specific provisions of this part, the following words and phrases when used in this part shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Bullying." Intentional electronic, written, verbal or physical acts that:(1) are directed at a student;(2) occur in a school setting;(3) are severe and persistent or pervasive; and(4) have the effect of doing any of the following:(i) substantially interfering with a student's education;(ii) creating a threatening environment; or(iii) substantially disrupting the orderly operation of the school."Bullying response coordinator." A staff member of the school entity designated by the principal or chief school administrator to oversee bullying response and compliance."Cyberbullying." Bullying that occurs through electronic communication, including email, social media, text messaging or an Internet-based platform."Safe2Say Program." The Safe2Say Program established under section 1303-D(a) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949."School entity." A public school district, charter school, cyber charter school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school.20250SB0982PN1127 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "School setting." As defined under section 1303.1-A of the Public School Code of 1949.CHAPTER 23SAFETY IN SCHOOLSSec.2301. Scope of chapter.2302. Bullying and cyberbullying prevention and response.2303. Data reporting and oversight.2304. Construction and compliance.§ 2301. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to improving safety and preventing incidents of bullying and cyberbullying in public schools.§ 2302. Bullying and cyberbullying prevention and response.(a) Policy requirements.--By July 1 of the year following the effective date of this subsection, each school entity shall adopt or revise the school entity's bullying prevention policy to include:(1) a prohibition against bullying, cyberbullying and retaliation;(2) confidential reporting procedures for students, staff and parents;(3) notification of the parents or guardians of each involved student within 24 hours of an investigated and confirmed incident, consistent with 20 U.S.C. § 1232g (relating to family educational and privacy rights);(4) a requiremen t to begin an investigation of any reported incident within three school days;(5) designation of a bullying response coordinator for each building or at a level appropriate for the size and population of the school entity ; 20250SB0982PN1127 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) age-appropriate instruction on bullying and cyberbullying prevention in existing health, civics or character education curricula; and(7) staff training at least once every three years and during onboarding or induction of new staff members.(b) Model policy.--Within 120 days of the effective date of this subsection, the department shall develop and publicly post a model anti-bullying policy and implementation toolkit using existing resources.(c) Streamlined reporting via Safe2Say Program.--A report of bullying or cyberbullying made by a school employee shall be submitted through the Safe2Say Program.§ 2303. Data reporting and oversight.(a) Reporting.--Each school entity shall submit anonymized annual data on bullying incidents and resolutions to the department using the Safe2Say system.(b) Review.--The department shall review submissions as part of existing Safe Schools compliance reviews.(c) Corrective action plans.--School entities found in noncompliance shall submit corrective action plans and shall be publicly identified in the department's annual report.§ 2304. Construction and compliance.(a) Construction.--Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to:(1) Require new appropriations, tax increases or additional personnel.(2) Alter or interfere with the requirements of 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to child protective services).(3) Prohibit constitutionally protected speech, including religious, political or social commentary, unless 20250SB0982PN1127 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the conduct meets the definition of bullying or cyberbullying.(b) Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act compliance.--Student information shall be protected in compliance with 20 U.S.C. § 1232g (relating to family educational and privacy rights) . (c) Equal protection compliance.--Actions under this chapter shall be administered consistent with equal protection guarantees under the Constitution of the United States and Constitution of Pennsylvania.Section 2. All acts and parts of acts are repealed insofar as they are inconsistent with the provisions of this act.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0982PN1127 - 5 - 12345678910111213